Florida, session 2026, HB951.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) is added to subsection (10) of
section 212.12, Florida Statutes, to read:
212.12 Dealer's credit for collecting tax; penalties for
noncompliance; powers of Department of Revenue in dealing with
delinquents; rounding; records required.—
(10)
(c)1. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "cash" has
the same meaning as defined in 12 U.S.C. s. 4001.
2. If the 1-cent piece is no longer in production, an in-
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb951-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 951 2026
person cash transaction may be rounded to the nearest nickel
using the following methodology:
a. If the final digit of a cash transaction ends in 1 or 2
cents, it must be rounded down to zero.
b. If the final digit of a cash transaction ends in 3 or 4
cents, it must be rounded up to 5 cents.
c. If the final digit of a cash transaction ends in 6 or 7
cents, it must be rounded down to 5 cents.
d. If the final digit of a cash transaction ends in 8 or 9
cents, it must be rounded up to 10 cents.
e. Cash transactions ending in 0 or 5 cents are not
rounded.
3. Rounding to the nickel applies only to cash
transactions. Rounding to the nickel does not apply to any
transaction for which payment is made by a noncash method,
including electronic funds transfer; check; gift card; money
order; credit card; or mixed tender, except to the extent that
cash is dispersed to the purchaser.
4. Rounding to the nickel does not alter the sales price,
the amount of tax collected under this chapter, or any
surcharges, assessments, or fees imposed on the sale.
5. Rounding to the nickel may apply to the amount of the
transaction or to the amount of change tendered to the
purchaser.
6. Rounding to the nickel does not alter or affect the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb951-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 951 2026
exact amounts authorized, cleared, or settled through any
noncash payment system or electronic transaction.
Section 2. Subsection (8) is added to section 501.212,
Florida Statutes, to read:
501.212 Application.—This part does not apply to:
(8) Rounding a consumer sale to the nickel if the 1-cent
piece is no longer in production.
Section 3. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 538.235,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3) and (4),
respectively, and a new subsection (2) is added to that section,
to read:
538.235 Method of payment.—
(2) Any cash payment made to a seller under this section
shall be made in the full amount due or rounded up to the
nearest nickel if the 1-cent piece is no longer in production.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb951-02-c2